Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,170.01
Board members; conflict of interest; treatment.

Members of the board shall comply with the conflict of interest provisions of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. Any member of the board who is also a director of a state agency shall abstain from voting on applications which would provide funding primarily to his or her agency.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 50.

Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, see section 49-1401.